Hawaii statutes.
§40-6 Approval of business and accounting
forms. The comptroller shall determine the forms required to adequately
supply accounting and statistical data for the state government. The
comptroller shall require heads of departments and establishments of the state
government to submit proposed new forms or proposed changes in current business
and accounting forms for review and approval before ordering the same printed;
except that the University of Hawaii until June 30, 2016, and the department of
education shall be subject to this requirement only with respect to uniform
business and accounting forms of statewide use in the State's accounting
system. All standard state forms shall be classified, numbered, and
standardized in design, dimensions, color, and grade of paper and recorded in a
catalogue of accounting and statistical forms by the comptroller. [L 1927, c
219, §2; RL 1935, §559; RL 1945, §1561; RL 1955, §34-10; am L 1957, c 152, §1;
am L 1959, c 145, §1; HRS §40-6; am L 1986, c 321, §§7, 12; am L 1987, c 283,
§69; am L 1989, c 371, §7; am L 1991, c 163, §3; am L 1993, c 314, §2; am L Sp
1993, c 8, §22; am L 1997, c 180, §1; am L 1998, c 115, §24; am L 2004, c 58, §§5,
14; am L 2005, c 22, §50 and c 137, §1; am L 2006, c 161, §§4, 7 and c 306, §1;
am L Sp 2009, c 5, §12; am L 2010, c 102, §5, and c 124, §8 as superseded by c
124, §12; am L 2015, c 44, §§4, 7, 8]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next